test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-IN-osi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôsi - ok : # -m animate noun
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg: ôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl: ôsa
     ôsi+N+IN+Loc: ôsihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: ôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: ôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: ôcisisihk

     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otôt
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: otôtiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôtinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôtinaw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôtiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otôtiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otôtiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otôta
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: otôtiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôtinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôtinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôtiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otôtiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otôtiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: ocôcisis
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: ocôcisisiyiw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicôcisisinân
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicôcisisinaw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicôcisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: ocôcisisiwâw
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: ocôcisisiyiw

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: ocôcisisa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Sg: ocôcisisiyiwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicôcisisinâna
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicôcisisinawa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicôcisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: ocôcisisiwâwa
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: ocôcisisiyiwa

     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôtihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: otôtiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôtinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôtinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôtiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôtiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otôtiyihk

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocôcisisihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocôcisisiyihk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicôcisisinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicôcisisinâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicôcisisiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocôcisisiwâhk
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocôcisisiyihk
